Idaho, session 2025, S1082.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 43-706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
43-706. LIEN OF ASSESSMENT. (1) All assessments shall be liens against
the property assessed from and after the first Monday in March of any year,
the lien for the bonds of any series shall be a preferred lien to that of any
subsequent series, except as in this title otherwise provided, and such lien
shall not be removed until the assessments are paid or the property sold for
the payment thereof.
(2) Assessment liens shall be a first lien on the property assessed and
shall be superior to the lien of any mortgage or deed of trust, whether prior
in time or not.
(3) The lien for the bonds of any series shall be a preferred lien to
that of any subsequent series, except as otherwise provided in this title.
(4) The lien shall not be removed until the assessments are paid, the
property is sold for the payment thereof, or the assessments are canceled
pursuant to section 43-716 or 43-1508, Idaho Code. Any mortgage or other
lien on such assessed property shall, in all cases, be subject to the assess-
ment lien provided in this section. Upon any sale of the property, the pur-
chaser at such sale shall take the property subject to any annual assessment
of the district that remains unpaid at the time of the sale.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.